Massachusetts, session 194th, H5216.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the 
department of conservation and recreation shall conduct a formal review of its coordinated 
management guidelines for sustainable forestry practices created pursuant to section 2F of 
chapter 21 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and the operations of 
the division of forest and parks, as described in chapter 132 of the general laws, as so appearing. 
(b) Said review shall occur every five years and i) assess the efficacy of the department’s 
existing forest management practices to protect and preserve the commonwealth’s natural 
resources; (ii) review the department’s landscape designation process and make 
recommendations for operational improvements, increased transparency, and improved 
opportunities for public participation; (iii) make recommendations for any statutory changes 
needed to improve the department’s management of public and private forest land; (iv) assess 
opportunities to increase acreage of forest reserves, with particular consideration for old growth 
forests; (v) assess the feasibility, advantages and disadvantages of making permanent 
designations for existing nature preserves, with particular consideration for old growth forests; 

of 3 15 (vi) make recommendations for transparency and accountability improvements for the division, 
including, but not limited to, proposed statutory changes to codify advisory committees and 
administrative bodies overseeing forest management; (vii) identify opportunities for nature-based 
solutions to maximize the utilization of forest land to meet the commonwealth’s emissions 
reduction goals; (viii) assess the department’s preparedness to manage and mitigate climate 
change impacts on public and private forest land; and (ix) assess the commonwealth’s capacity 
for carbon sequestration on public forest land as a method to mitigate climate change. 
(c) The forests and parks of the commonwealth now under the care, custody and control 
of the commissioner and subject to the formal review shall not be leased, sold, or exchanged, or 
be taken by any corporation, public or private, nor shall the timber thereon be sold, removed or 
destroyed, except as a response to a known forest management emergency, and no commercial 
activities except those essential to the quiet enjoyment of the facilities by the people shall be 
permitted on such lands until the department has submitted its findings to the clerks of the house 
of representatives and the senate, the joint committee on ways and means and the joint 
committee on environment and natural resources pursuant to Section 2 of this act. 
SECTION 2. The department shall solicit public input on its forest management practices 
as part of the review process. Not later than March 1, 2027, the department shall (i) hold no 
fewer than 4 public hearings in geographically-diverse regions to receive public testimony on 
forest management in the commonwealth and shall provide for remote participation; and (ii) 
solicit and accept written and electronic testimony submissions from the public. Not later than 
May 1, 2027, the department shall release a draft report of its findings and solicit public 
comment for at least 30 days. 

of 3 37  SECTION 3. The department shall submit its findings, along with any updated 
guidelines, draft regulations, recommendations for statutory changes, and written comments and 
summaries of oral testimony submitted during public comment periods to the clerks of the house 
of representatives and the senate, the joint committee on ways and means and the joint 
committee on environment and natural resources not later than June 30, 2027.